Maryland, session 2025, SB0498.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0498*

SENATE BILL 498
Article – Education
7–410.
(A) Each public school shall have a program of safety education that is organized
and administered under the bylaws, rules, and regulations of the State Board.
(B) THE PROGRAM OF SAFETY EDUCATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION
(A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE STUDENT INSTRUCTION ON SCHOOL BUS
SAFETY AND THE PROPER USE OF SEAT BELTS ON SCHOOL BUSES.
Article – Transportation
11–153.
“School bus” means a Type I school vehicle, as defined in this subtitle.
11–173.
(a) “Type I school vehicle” means a school vehicle that:
(1) Is designed and constructed to carry passengers;
(2) Is either of the body–on–chassis type construction or integral type
construction; and
(3) Has a gross vehicle weight of more than 15,000 pounds and provides a
minimum of 13 inches of seating space per passenger.
(b) “Type I school vehicle” does not include any bus operated by a common carrier
under the jurisdiction of a State, regional, or federal regulatory agency or operated by the
agency itself.
21–1118.
(a) The driver of a school bus:
(1) Is responsible for its operation; and
(2) May not drive it into any roadway without first stopping and
determining that there is no danger from any other vehicle.
(b) The person responsible for any pupils on a school bus is:
(1) The teacher on the bus; or
(2) If a teacher is not present, the driver.

SENATE BILL 498 3
(c) A person responsible for pupils on a school bus may not [permit] ALLOW the
number of standing pupils to exceed one pupil for each part of the aisle that is bounded on
both sides by forward facing seats.
(d) A person responsible for pupils on a school bus may not [permit] ALLOW any
pupil to stand if the school bus is equipped only with lengthwise or a combination of
lengthwise and forward facing seats.
(e) A person responsible for pupils on a school bus may not [permit] ALLOW any
pupil to stand in front of the stanchion and guardrail.
(f) A person responsible for pupils on a school bus may not [permit] ALLOW any
pupil to operate the front door opening mechanism, except in an emergency.
(g) A person responsible for pupils on a school bus may not require any pupil to
sit on the floor.
(h) Except for the driver and any fuel station attendant, a person may not occupy
a school bus while it is being supplied with fuel.
(i) Either the driver or an adult aide assigned to each school vehicle that is used
to transport handicapped children shall be certified as having successfully completed a first
aid–safety course approved by the Department of Education.
22–412.
(a) Every motor vehicle registered in [this] THE State and manufactured or
assembled after June 1, 1964, shall be equipped with two sets of seat belts on the front seat
of the vehicle.
(b) Every motor vehicle registered in [this] THE State and manufactured or
assembled with a rear seat after June 1, 1969, shall be equipped with two sets of seat belts
on the rear seat of the vehicle.
(c) EVERY SCHOOL BUS PURCHASED ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2027, AND
REGISTERED IN THE STATE SHALL BE EQUIPPED WITH, FOR EACH SEAT ON THE
SCHOOL BUS, 3–POINT SEAT BELTS THAT ARE ACCESSIBLE TO PASSENGERS.
(D) A person may not sell or offer for sale any vehicle in violation of this section.
[(d)] (E) For the purpose of this section only, “motor vehicle” does not include
any motorcycle other than an autocycle, bus, or truck.
[(e)] (F) For the purpose of this section only, “seat belt” means any belt, strap,
harness, or like device.

SENATE BILL 498
[(f)] (G) A seat belt may not be sold or offered for sale for use in connection with
the operation of a motor vehicle in [this] THE State after June 1, 1964, unless it meets
applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards.
22–412.3.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) (i) “Motor vehicle” means a vehicle that is:
1. Registered or capable of being registered in [this] THE
State as a Class A (passenger), Class E (truck), Class F (tractor), Class M (multipurpose),
or Class P (passenger bus) vehicle; and
2. Required to be equipped with seat belts under federal
motor vehicle safety standards contained in the Code of Federal Regulations.
(ii) “Motor vehicle” does not include a Class L (historic) vehicle.
(3) “Outboard front seat” means a front seat position that is adjacent to a
door of a motor vehicle.
(4) (i) “Seat belt” means a restraining device described under § 22–412
of this subtitle.
(ii) “Seat belt” includes a combination seat belt–shoulder harness.
(b) A person may not operate a motor vehicle unless the person and each occupant
under 16 years old are restrained by a seat belt or a child safety seat as provided in §
22–412.2 of this subtitle.
(c) (1) The provisions of this subsection apply to a person who is at least 16
years old.
(2) Unless a person is restrained by a seat belt, the person may not be a
passenger in an outboard front seat of a motor vehicle.
(3) (i) Unless a person is restrained by a seat belt, the person may not
be a passenger in a rear seat of a motor vehicle.
(ii) A police officer may enforce this paragraph only as a secondary
action when the police officer detains a driver of a motor vehicle for a suspected violation
of another provision of the Code.
(d) If a physician licensed to practice medicine in [this] THE State determines
and certifies in writing that use of a seat belt by a person would prevent appropriate

SENATE BILL 498 5
restraint due to a person’s physical disability or other medical reason, the provisions of this
section do not apply to the person.
(e) A certification under subsection (d) of this section shall state:
(1) The nature of the physical disability; and
(2) The reason that restraint by a seat belt is inappropriate.
(f) The provisions of this section do not apply to U.S. Postal Service and contract
carriers while delivering mail to local box routes.
(g) A violation of this section is not considered a moving violation for purposes of
§ 16–402 of this article.
(h) (1) Failure of an individual to use a seat belt in violation of this section may
not:
(i) Be considered evidence of negligence;
(ii) Be considered evidence of contributory negligence;
(iii) Limit liability of a party or an insurer; or
(iv) Diminish recovery for damages arising out of the ownership,
maintenance, or operation of a motor vehicle.
(2) Subject to the provisions of paragraph (3) of this subsection, a party,
witness, or counsel may not make reference to a seat belt during a trial of a civil action that
involves property damage, personal injury, or death if the damage, injury, or death is not
related to the design, manufacture, installation, supplying, or repair of a seat belt.
(3) (i) Nothing contained in this subsection may be construed to
prohibit the right of a person to institute a civil action for damages against a dealer,
manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or other appropriate entity arising out of an
incident that involves a defectively installed or defectively operating seat belt.
(ii) In a civil action in which [2] TWO or more parties are named as
joint tort–feasors, interpleaded as defendants, or impleaded as defendants, and [1] ONE of
the joint tort–feasors or defendants is not involved in the design, manufacture, installation,
supplying, or repair of a seat belt, a court shall order separate trials to accomplish the ends
of justice on a motion of any party.
(4) THE FAILURE OF A SCHOOL BUS OPERATOR TO ENSURE THAT AN
OCCUPANT OF A SCHOOL BUS WAS WEARING A SEAT BELT MAY NOT BE THE BASIS OF

SENATE BILL 498
A CIVIL ACTION FOR DAMAGES AGAINST THE SCHOOL BUS OPERATOR OR A SCHOOL,
SCHOOL DISTRICT, OR MUNICIPALITY.
(i) The Administration and the Department of State Police shall establish
prevention and education programs to encourage compliance with the provisions of this
section.
(j) The Administration shall include information on [this] THE State’s experience
with the provisions of this section in the annual evaluation report on the State’s highway
safety plan that [this] THE State submits to the National Highway Traffic Safety
Administration and the Federal Highway Administration under 23 U.S.C. § 402.
(k) Any person convicted of a violation of this section is subject to a fine of not
more than $50.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.